Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB252.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1426. Parental Notification of Implementation of Mental Health Services Digital Platform by School Entity.--(a) A school entity that provides a student enrolled in the school entity with access to and use of a mental health services digital platform may not permit the student to access and use the platform or facilitate access to the platform without receiving specific written permission from the parent or legal guardian of the student after being provided the notice required 1234567891011121314151617181920 under subsection (f).(b) The parent or legal guardian may, at any time, withdraw permission in writing. Unless otherwise specified in writing by the parent or legal guardian, the withdrawal of permission shall take effect immediately upon delivery to a school official, and the school shall immediately refrain from further facilitation or promotion of access to the mental health digital platform.(c) The school entity shall provide a written procedure and a sample consent or withdrawal form in the school administration office and on the school entity's publicly accessible Internet website for a parent or legal guardian to provide or withdraw permission for the student to access and use or receive materials designed to facilitate access to the mental health services digital platform. The consent or withdrawal form shall not be drafted or presented in a manner that makes it more difficult to withhold or revoke consent than it is to grant consent.(d) Upon request, a parent or legal guardian of a student may:(1) be present with the student in an authorized school setting while the student accesses and uses the mental health services digital platform on school premises, unless good cause for the exclusion of the parent or legal guardian is documented by the governing board of the school entity; and(2) access, review, refuse further collection of or delete the personal information collected from the student online to the extent allowed by 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights) or other applicable Federal or State law.(e) A parent or legal guardian of a student who has given 20250HB0252PN0201 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permission for the student to access and use or receive materials that facilitate access to a mental health services digital platform and who reasonably believes that the school entity has denied the presence of the parent or legal guardian while the student accesses and uses the platform on school premises without good cause has a private right of action against the governing body of the school entity.(f) A school entity that provides or intends to provide a student enrolled in the school entity with access to and use of or promotes or otherwise facilitates the use of a mental health services digital platform shall provide written notification to a parent or legal guardian of the student of the intention or activity at least thirty (30) days prior to implementation of the platform or promotion, access, use of the platform or other activity designed to accomplish the same by the student. The notification shall include the following:(1) A clear and detailed description of the platform in a manner that provides a meaningful understanding to the parent or guardian of the platform's practices, mission and structure, including the platform's teachings, approach and philosophies, lessons, available materials, activities and licenses.(2) A statement that the school entity may not provide access to, promote or otherwise facilitate the use of the platform to a student without written permission of the student's parent or legal guardian.(3) A statement that the parent or legal guardian, upon request, may be present with the student in an authorized school setting while the student accesses or uses the platform on school premises, unless good cause for the exclusion of the parent or legal guardian is documented by the governing board of 20250HB0252PN0201 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the school entity.(4) A statement that the parent or legal guardian has a private right of action against the governing board of the school entity if the school entity fails to comply with subsection (d).(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authorized school setting." A physical space designated by a school entity for a parent or legal guardian of a student enrolled in the school entity to accompany the student while the student accesses or uses a mental health services digital platform on the school premises."Mental health services." The provision of assistance or counsel or preparation of a plan of assistance or counsel to a student that relates to the mental health or well-being of the student."Mental health services digital platform" or "platform." An electronic Internet-based tool that provides for support, prevention and treatment in mental health, including an online student peer support community, integrated guided and self-guided mental health assessment, therapeutic tools and content, and clinical interaction with a mental health practitioner in real time and via scheduled therapy through text-based interactions."School entity." A school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0252PN0201 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829